Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7778.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-53-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-53 entitled "Low and
Moderate Income Housing" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-53-14. Database of low-income rental units Database of low- or moderate- income
rental units.
(a) The executive office of housing established pursuant to § 42-167-1 or the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation established pursuant to § 42-55-4 (the “corporation”)
shall maintain host an online database (“database”) of residential developments that meet the
definition of low- or moderate-income housing under § 45-53-3 low-income housing tax credit
developments that are designated only for households at or below sixty percent (60%) of area
median income, adjusted for household size and subsidized housing developments, as referenced
in the corporation’s Rhode Island resource guide, which are designated only for households at or
below eighty percent (80%) of area median income, adjusted for household size (collectively “low-
income rental units”) in the state on the executive office of housing or the corporation’s website.
The corporation shall place an emphasis on To the extent possible, the database containing shall
contain the following:
(1) Current, updated information on the existing inventory of low- or moderate-income
rental units housing in the state;
(2) The contact person or entity and contact information pertaining to individual
developments;

(3) To the extent the information is available, a A copy of the application to apply for
housing in individual developments; and
(4) Information pertaining to any special populations, including, but not limited to, elderly,
disabled, homeless individuals, and victims of domestic violence, served by individual
developments.
(5) To the extent possible, the database shall allow individuals to identify the different
types of affordable housing they are interested in and be alerted when developments that meet that
criteria become available for lease or sale.
(b) This database shall be accessible to the public by July 1, 2023.
SECTION 2. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-14.1. Listing by owners of low- or moderate-income housing.
(a) Any owner of a property qualifying as low- or moderate-income housing, as defined by
§ 45-53-3, shall list that property on the database referenced in § 45-53-14.
(b) For developments completed after January 1, 2027, the property should be listed prior
to or concurrently with the opening of the property for lease-up, accepting applications or, in the
case of homeownership units, listing units for sale.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, low- or moderate-income
homeownership units shall only be listed on the database prior to their initial sale and prior to or
concurrently with listing the property for re-sale.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004937
========
LC004937 - Page 2 of 3